Florida, session 2026, HB115.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 552.445, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb115-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 115 2026
552.445 Property damage caused by limestone mining
operations; legislative findings and intent.—
(1) The Legislature finds that:
(a) Limestone mining for aggregate is an essential
component of this state's economy, contributing to
infrastructure development and construction by providing a cost-
effective source of concrete.
(b) Limiting limestone mining operations would result in
increased costs of construction, adversely affecting this
state's economy and its residents.
(2) The Legislature also recognizes the concerns of
residents in North West Miami-Dade County and South West Broward
County, who have reported property damage resulting from ground
vibrations caused by nearby limestone mining operations.
(3) It is the intent of the Legislature to provide a fair
and equitable remedy for property owners who can prove that
their property damage was caused by nearby limestone mining
operations.
Section 2. Section 552.4451, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
552.4451 Definitions.—As used in ss. 552.445-552.4454, the
term:
(1) "Claimant" means a property owner who files a claim
for compensation for property damage caused by limestone mining
operations.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb115-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 115 2026
(2) "Division" means the Division of Administrative
Hearings.
(3) "Ground vibrations" means seismic activity in the
ground caused by the use of explosives, heavy machinery, or
other mining operations involved in limestone extraction or
processing. Such activity may be mechanically detected by
seismographic monitoring or other means within a radius of up to
3 miles from the point of origin.
(4) "Limestone mining operation" means the extraction and
processing of limestone for use in concrete aggregate which
results in ground vibrations.
(5) "Property damage" means any physical damage to a
structure, a foundation, or property caused by ground vibrations
or a related impact resulting from limestone mining operations.
(6) "Property owner" means an individual or entity holding
title to real property in this state.
Section 3. Section 552.4452, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
552.4452 Claims; statute of limitations.—
(1) A property owner whose property is located within a 3
mile radius of limestone mining operations who has sustained
property damage as a result of such operations has the right to
file a claim for compensation.
(2) A claim for compensation must include all of the
following:
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb115-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 115 2026
(a) Evidence of property ownership.
(b) Evidence of property damage.
(c) Evidence linking the property damage to the limestone
mining operations, including, but not limited to, mechanical
detection of ground vibrations.
(3) A claim brought under this section must be filed
within 2 years after the date the property damage was discovered
or reasonably should have been discovered.
Section 4. Section 552.4453, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
552.4453 Adjudication of claims.—
(1) Claims brought under s. 552.4452 shall be adjudicated
by the division.
(2) The division shall:
(a) Conduct a hearing to determine the validity of a
claim.
(b) Allow for the presentation of evidence, including, but
not limited to, expert testimony, vibration monitoring data, and
structural evaluations.
(3) The claimant must demonstrate by the greater weight of
the evidence that the property damage was caused by limestone
mining operations.
(4) The administrative law judge shall issue a finding of
facts and determine if the claimant has demonstrated competent
100 and substantial evidence to prove by the greater weight of the
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb115-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 115 2026
101 evidence that the property damage was caused by limestone mining
102 operations.
103 Section 5. Section 552.4454, Florida Statutes, is created
104 to read:
105 552.4454 Appropriation and compensation.—
106 (1) The Legislature shall appropriate each fiscal year
107 from the General Revenue Fund moneys to the Insurance Regulatory
108 Trust Fund to ensure the prompt payment of compensation awarded
109 by an administrative law judge under s. 552.4453.
110 (2)(a) If a claim is upheld by the administrative law
111 judge under s. 553.4453, the state must compensate the claimant
112 for costs to repair structural damage to the claimant's
113 property.
114 (b) Compensation amounts are determined based on the
115 market rates for such repair costs.
116 Section 6. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb115-00